Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB391.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4552 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 4552. General requirements for school buses.* * *(c.1) Video monitoring system.--(1) By July 1, 2026, every school bus shall have a video monitoring system that, at a minimum, includes an internal camera positioned so that every seat is within the camera's field of vision and one of the following:(i) an internal camera positioned outward so that the road ahead is within the camera's field of vision; or(ii) an external camera.(2) The department shall promulgate regulations to 123456789101112131415161718 implement this subsection.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0391PN0356 - 2 - 123